Washington statutes.
RCW 15.09.020

Creation of board.

Either upon receiving a petition filed by twenty-five landowners within the county or on its own motion, the board of county commissioners in order to achieve the purposes of this chapter may, following a hearing, create a horticultural pest and disease board.

[ 1969 c 113 s 2.]